Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-8,153
Rules and regulations.

The State Board of Education may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Teach in Nebraska Today Act.

Laws 2022, LB1218, § 8.
July 21, 2022